Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-96] Approval by the convening
authority. In acting on the findings and sentence of a court-martial, the
convening authority may approve only such findings of guilty, and the sentence
or such part or amount of the sentence, as the convening authority finds
correct in law and fact and as the convening authority in the convening
authority's discretion determines should be approved. Unless the convening
authority indicates otherwise, approval of the sentence is approval of the
findings and sentence. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next